North Carolina, session 2025, SB723.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-805 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-805. Prohibit viewing of pornography on government networks and devices.
…
(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to an official or employee that
is engaged in any of the following activities in the course of that official's or employee's official
duties:
(1) Investigating or prosecuting crimes, offering or participating in law
enforcement training, or performing actions related to other law enforcement
purposes.
(2) Identifying potential security or cybersecurity threats.
(3) Protecting human life.
(4) Establishing, testing, and maintaining firewalls, protocols, and otherwise
implementing this section.
(5) Participating in judicial or quasi-judicial proceedings.
(6) Conducting or participating in an externally funded research project at one of
the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina.
(7) Researching issues related to the drafting or analysis of the laws of this State
as necessary to fulfill the requirements of the employee's official duties.
(8) Investigating matters involving offenders incarcerated with, or otherwise
under the supervision of, the Department of Adult Correction, or matters
related to the misuse of devices owned by the Department of Adult Correction.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to investigations
performed before, on, or after that date.
*S723-v-1*